pt-PT: Recortes para sensores de para-choques: Aberturas para luzes de nevoeiro/auxiliares; Provisão para câmara frontal; Orifícios para lava-faróis; Provisão para suporte de matrícula; Nenhum; Orifícios para sensores de estacionamento; Provisão para sensor de radar/velocidade cruzeiro; Provisão para câmara traseira; Aberturas para gancho de reboque; Outro
tr: Tampon sensörü kesikleri: Sis/yardımcı far delikleri; Ön kamera yuvası; Far yıkama delikleri; Plaka braketi yuvası; Yok; Park sensörü delikleri; Radar/hız sabitleyici sensör yuvası; Arka kamera yuvası; Çeki demiri delikleri; Diğer
es: Recortes para sensores de parachoques: Aberturas para faros antiniebla/auxiliares; Espacio para cámara frontal; Agujeros para lavafaros; Espacio para soporte de placa de matrícula; Ninguno; Agujeros para sensores de estacionamiento; Provisión para sensor de radar/crucero; Provisión para cámara trasera; Aberturas para ganchos de remolque; Otro
th: ช่องเปิดสำหรับเซ็นเซอร์บนกันชน: ช่องไฟตัดหมอก/ไฟสปอตไลต์; ช่องรองรับกล้องหน้า; รูที่ฉีดน้ำล้างไฟหน้า; ช่องรองรับขายึดป้ายทะเบียน; ไม่มี; รูเซนเซอร์จอดรถ; ช่องรองรับเรดาร์/เซนเซอร์ครูซคอนโทรล; ช่องรองรับกล้องหลัง; ช่องตะขอลากจูง; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 保险杠传感器切口: 雾灯/辅助灯孔; 前置摄像头预留孔; 大灯清洗器孔; 牌照支架预留孔; 无; 倒车雷达孔; 雷达/巡航传感器预留孔; 后置摄像头预留孔; 拖车钩孔; 其他
el: Ανοίγματα αισθητήρων προφυλακτήρα: Ανοίγματα για φώτα ομίχλης/βοηθητικά; Υποδοχή μπροστινής κάμερας; Οπές συστήματος πλύσης προβολέων; Υποδοχή βάσης πινακίδας; Κανένα; Οπές αισθητήρων παρκαρίσματος; Υποδοχή αισθητήρα ραντάρ/cruise control; Υποδοχή πίσω κάμερας; Ανοίγματα για γάντζους ρυμούλκησης; Άλλο
sl-SI: Izrezi na odbijaču za senzorje: Odprtine za meglenke / dodatne luči; Priprava za sprednjo kamero; Odprtine za pranje žarometov; Priprava za nosilec registrske tablice; Brez; Odprtine za parkirne senzorje; Priprava za radar / senzor tempomata; Priprava za zadnjo kamero; Odprtine za vlečno kljuko; Drugo
en: Bumper sensor cutouts: Fog/aux light openings; Front camera provision; Headlight washer holes; License plate bracket provision; None; Parking sensor holes; Radar/cruise sensor provision; Rear camera provision; Tow hook openings; Other
de: Aussparungen für Stoßfängersensoren: Aussparungen für Nebel-/Zusatzscheinwerfer; Vorbereitung für Frontkamera; Aussparungen für Scheinwerferreinigungsanlage; Vorbereitung für Kennzeichenhalterung; Keine; Aussparungen für Parksensoren; Vorbereitung für Radar-/Abstandssensor; Vorbereitung für Rückfahrkamera; Aussparungen für Abschlepphaken; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Výrezy senzorov nárazníka: Otvory na hmlovky/prídavné svetlá; Príprava na prednú kameru; Otvory na ostrekovače svetlometov; Príprava na držiak evidenčného čísla vozidla; Žiadne; Otvory na parkovacie senzory; Príprava na radar/senzor tempomatu; Príprava na zadnú kameru; Otvory na ťažný hák; Iné
nl: Bumper sensoruitsparingen: Opening mist-/hulplichten; Voorziening frontcamera; Koplampsproeiergaten; Voorziening kentekenplaathouder; Geen; Gaten voor parkeersensoren; Voorziening radar-/cruisesensor; Voorziening achteruitrijcamera; Trekoogopeningen; Overig
ro-RO: Decupaje senzori bară de protecție: Deschideri pentru faruri de ceață/auxiliare; Pregătire cameră frontală; Orificii pentru spălătoare faruri; Pregătire suport număr de înmatriculare; Fără; Orificii pentru senzori de parcare; Pregătire senzor radar/croazieră; Prevăzut cu suport pentru camera din spate; Deschideri pentru cârlig de remorcare; Altele
nb: Utskjæringer for støtfangersensorer: Åpninger for tåkelys/ekstralys; Klargjort for frontkamera; Hull til lyktespyler; Klargjort for nummerskiltbrakett; Ingen; Hull for parkeringssensor; Klargjort for radar/cruise-sensor; Klargjort for ryggekamera; Åpninger for slepekrok; Annet
hu: Lökhárító szenzornyílásai: Ködlámpa/kiegészítő lámpa nyílások; Első kamera előkészítés; Fényszórómosó nyílások; Rendszámtábla-tartó előkészítés; Nincs; Parkolóradar nyílások; Radar/tempomatszenzor előkészítés; Hátsó kamera előkészítés; Vonószem nyílások; Egyéb
da: Udskæringer til kofangersensorer: Åbninger til tågelygter/ekstralys; Forberedt til frontkamera; Huller til lygtevasker; Forberedt til nummerpladebeslag; Ingen; Huller til parkeringssensor; Forberedt til radar/fartpilot-sensor; Forberedt til bakkamera; Åbninger til trækkrog; Andet
pl: Wycięcia na czujniki zderzaka: Otwory na światła przeciwmgielne / dodatkowe; Miejsce na przednią kamerę; Otwory na spryskiwacze reflektorów; Miejsce na wspornik tablicy rejestracyjnej; Brak; Otwory na czujniki parkowania; Miejsce na czujnik radaru / tempomatu; Miejsce na tylną kamerę; Otwory na hak holowniczy; Inne
sv: Utskärningar för stötfångarsensorer: Öppningar för dimljus/extraljus; Plats för frontkamera; Hål för strålkastarspolare; Fäste för registreringsskylt; Ingen; Hål för parkeringssensorer; Plats för radar-/farthållarsensor; Plats för backkamera; Öppningar för dragkrok; Övrigt
it: Ritagli per sensori paraurti: Aperture per fendinebbia/luci ausiliarie; Predisposizione fotocamera anteriore; Fori lavafari; Predisposizione staffa targa; Nessuna; Fori per sensori di parcheggio; Predisposizione sensore radar/cruise control; Predisposizione fotocamera posteriore; Aperture per gancio di traino; Altro
ja: バンパーセンサーカットアウト: フォグ/補助ライト用開口部; フロントカメラ用開口部; ヘッドライトウォッシャー穴; ナンバープレートブラケット用スペース; なし; パーキングセンサー穴; レーダー/クルーズセンサー用スペース; リアカメラ用スペース; 牽引フック用開口部; その他
bg-BG: Изрези за сензори в бронята: Отвори за фарове за мъгла/допълнителни светлини; Отвор за предна камера; Отвори за пръскалки на фаровете; Отвор за стойка за регистрационна табела; Няма; Отвори за паркинг сензори; Отвор за радар/круиз сензор; Отвор за задна камера; Отвори за кука за теглене; Друго
zh-TW: 保險桿感測器開孔: 霧燈/輔助燈開口; 前置相機預留孔; 頭燈清洗器孔; 車牌架預留孔; 無; 停車感測器孔; 雷達/巡航感測器預留孔; 後置相機預留孔; 拖車鉤開口; 其他
ru: Вырезы под датчики в бампере: Отверстия для противотуманных/дополнительных фар; Место для фронтальной камеры; Отверстия для омывателей фар; Место для рамки номерного знака; Нет; Отверстия для парктроников; Место для датчика радара/круиз-контроля; Место для камеры заднего вида; Отверстия для буксировочного крюка; Другое
hr-HR: Izrezi senzora branika: Otvori za svjetla za maglu / dodatna svjetla; Priprema za prednju kameru; Otvori za perače prednjih svjetala; Priprema za nosač registarske pločice; Nema; Otvori za parkirne senzore; Priprema za radar / senzor tempomata; Priprema za stražnju kameru; Otvori za kuku za vuču; Ostalo
fi: Puskurin anturin aukot: Sumu-/lisävaloaukot; Etukameravalmius; Ajovalojen pesimien reiät; Rekisterikilven telinevalmius; Ei mitään; Pysäköintianturien reiät; Tutka-/vakionopeusanturivalmius; Takakameravalmius; Hinauskoukkujen aukot; Muu
ko: 범퍼 센서 절단부: 안개등/보조 조명 개구부; 전면 카메라 설치부; 헤드라이트 워셔 홀; 번호판 브래킷 설치부; 없음; 주차 센서 홀; 레이더/크루즈 센서 설치부; 후면 카메라 설치부; 견인 후크 개구부; 기타
cs: Otvory pro senzory v nárazníku: Otvory pro mlhová / přídavná světla; Příprava pro přední kameru; Otvory pro ostřikovače světlometů; Příprava pro držák SPZ; Žádné; Otvory pro parkovací senzory; Příprava pro radar / tempomat; Příprava pro zadní kameru; Otvory pro tažné oko; Jiné
lt-LT: Buferio jutiklių išpjovos: Priešrūkinių / pagalbinių žibintų angos; Priekinės kameros vieta; Žibintų ploviklių angos; Valstybinio numerio laikiklio vieta; Nėra; Parkavimo jutiklių angos; Radaro / atstumo jutiklio vieta; Galinės kameros vieta; Vilksės kablio angos; Kita
pt-BR: Recortes para sensores de para-choque: Aberturas para luz de neblina/auxiliar; Espaço para câmera frontal; Orifícios para lavador de farol; Espaço para suporte de placa de licença; Nenhum; Orifícios para sensor de estacionamento; Espaço para radar/sensor de cruzeiro; Espaço para câmera traseira; Aberturas para gancho de reboque; Outros
fr: Découpes pour capteurs de pare-chocs: Ouvertures pour phares antibrouillard/auxiliaires; Emplacement pour caméra avant; Trous pour lave-phares; Emplacement pour support de plaque d’immatriculation; Aucun; Trous pour capteurs de stationnement; Emplacement pour radar/capteur de régulateur de vitesse; Emplacement pour caméra arrière; Ouvertures pour crochets de remorquage; Autre
vi: Các lỗ cắt cảm biến cản xe: Lỗ hở đèn sương mù/đèn phụ; Khe cắm camera trước; Lỗ rửa đèn pha; Khe cắm giá đỡ biển số; Không có; Lỗ cảm biến đỗ xe; Khe cắm cảm biến radar/hành trình; Khe cắm camera sau; Lỗ móc kéo; Khác